Nevada, session 83, AB274.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 76 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 1.1 and 1.3 of this act.
Sec. 1.1. “Eligible veteran” means a resident of this State
who retired from the Armed Forces of the United States after 20 or
more years of creditable service or because of a physical disability
as described in 10 U.S.C. § 1201.
Sec. 1.3. “Gold star family member” means a resident of this
State who is the spouse or a natural or adoptive child or parent of
a member of the Armed Forces of the United States as described in
10 U.S.C. § 1126(a).
Sec. 1.5. NRS 76.010 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.010 As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise
requires, the words and terms defined in NRS 76.020 to 76.040,
inclusive, and sections 1.1 and 1.3 of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 1.7. NRS 76.100 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.100 1. A person shall not conduct a business in this State
unless and until the person obtains a state business license issued by
the Secretary of State. If the person is:
(a) An entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license at the time of filing the initial or annual list.
(b) Not an entity required to file an initial or annual list with the
Secretary of State pursuant to this title, the person must obtain the
state business license before conducting a business in this State.
2. An application for a state business license must:
(a) Be made upon a form prescribed by the Secretary of State;
(b) Set forth the name under which the applicant transacts or
intends to transact business, or if the applicant is an entity organized
pursuant to this title and on file with the Secretary of State, the exact
name on file with the Secretary of State, the business identification
number as assigned by the Secretary of State pursuant to NRS
225.082, and the location in this State of the place or places of
business;
(c) [Be] Except as otherwise provided in subsection 8, be
accompanied by a fee in the amount of $200 [, except that] or, if the
applicant is a corporation organized pursuant to chapter 78, 78A or
78B of NRS, or a foreign corporation required to file an initial or
annual list with the Secretary of State pursuant to chapter 80 of
NRS, [the application must be accompanied by] a fee of $500; and
(d) Include any other information that the Secretary of State
deems necessary.
-
*AB274_R1*

– 3 –
 If the applicant is an entity organized pursuant to this title and on
file with the Secretary of State and the applicant has no location in
this State of its place of business, the address of its registered agent
shall be deemed to be the location in this State of its place of
business.
3. The application must be signed pursuant to NRS 239.330 by:
(a) The owner of a business that is owned by a natural person.
(b) A member or partner of an association or partnership.
(c) A general partner of a limited partnership.
(d) A managing partner of a limited-liability partnership.
(e) A manager or managing member of a limited-liability
company.
(f) An officer of a corporation or some other person specifically
authorized by the corporation to sign the application.
4. If the application for a state business license is defective in
any respect or the fee required by this section is not paid, the
Secretary of State may return the application for correction or
payment.
5. A state business license issued pursuant to this section must
contain the business identification number assigned by the Secretary
of State pursuant to NRS 225.082.
6. The state business license required to be obtained pursuant
to this section is in addition to any license to conduct business that
must be obtained from the local jurisdiction in which the business is
being conducted.
7. For the purposes of this chapter, a person:
(a) Shall be deemed to conduct a business in this State if a
business for which the person is responsible:
(1) Is organized pursuant to this title, other than a business
organized pursuant to:
(I) Chapter 82 or 84 of NRS; or
(II) Chapter 81 of NRS if the business is a nonprofit unit-
owners’ association or a nonprofit religious, charitable, fraternal or
other organization that qualifies as a tax-exempt organization
pursuant to 26 U.S.C. § 501(c);
(2) Has an office or other base of operations in this State;
(3) Except as otherwise provided in NRS 76.103, has a
registered agent in this State; or
(4) Pays wages or other remuneration to a natural person
who performs in this State any of the duties for which he or she is
paid.
(b) Shall be deemed not to conduct a business in this State if:
(1) The business for which the person is responsible:
(I) Is not organized pursuant to this title;
-
*AB274_R1*

– 4 –
(II) Does not have an office or base of operations in this
State;
(III) Does not have a registered agent in this State; and
(IV) Does not pay wages or other remuneration to a
natural person who performs in this State any of the duties for which
he or she is paid, other than wages or other remuneration paid to a
natural person for performing duties in connection with an activity
described in subparagraph (2);
(2) The business for which the person is responsible is
conducting activity in this State solely to provide vehicles or
equipment on a short-term basis in response to a wildland fire, a
flood, an earthquake or another emergency; or
(3) The Secretary of State determines that the person is not
conducting a business in this State.
8. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 9, the Secretary
of State shall waive the fee required by this section if the applicant
is:
(a) A natural person who is an eligible veteran;
(b) A natural person who is a gold star family member; or
(c) An entity organized pursuant to this title in which at least
51 percent of the ownership interest in the entity is held by one or
more eligible veterans or gold star family members.
9. The Secretary of State shall not waive the fee required by
this section if an applicant has received a waiver pursuant to
subsection 8 for another qualifying business.
10. As used in this section, “registered agent” has the meaning
ascribed to it in NRS 77.230.
Sec. 1.9. NRS 76.130 is hereby amended to read as follows:
76.130 1. Except as otherwise provided in [subsection]
subsections 2 [,] and 6, a person who applies for renewal of a state
business license shall submit a fee in the amount of $200 to the
Secretary of State:
(a) If the person is an entity required to file an annual list with
the Secretary of State pursuant to this title, at the time the person
submits the annual list to the Secretary of State, unless the person
submits a certificate or other form evidencing the dissolution of the
entity; or
(b) If the person is not an entity required to file an annual list
with the Secretary of State pursuant to this title, on the last day of
the month in which the anniversary date of issuance of the state
business license occurs in each year, unless the person submits a
written statement to the Secretary of State, at least 10 days before
that date, indicating that the person will not be conducting a
business in this State after that date.
-
*AB274_R1*

– 5 –
2. If the person applying for the renewal of a state business
license pursuant to subsection 1 is a corporation organized pursuant
to chapter 78, 78A or 78B of NRS, or a foreign corporation required
to file an initial or annual list with the Secretary of State pursuant to
chapter 80 of NRS, the fee for the renewal of a state business license
is $500.
3. The Secretary of State shall, 90 days before the last day for
filing an application for renewal of the state business license of a
person who holds a state business license, provide to the person a
notice of the state business license fee due pursuant to this section
and a reminder to file the application for renewal required pursuant
to this section. Failure of any person to receive a notice does not
excuse the person from the penalty imposed by law.
4. If a person fails to submit the annual state business license
fee required pursuant to this section in a timely manner and the
person is:
(a) An entity required to file an annual list with the Secretary of
State pursuant to this title, the person:
(1) Shall pay a penalty of $100 in addition to the annual state
business license fee;
(2) Shall be deemed to have not complied with the
requirement to file an annual list with the Secretary of State; and
(3) Is subject to all applicable provisions relating to the
failure to file an annual list, including, without limitation, the
provisions governing default and revocation of its charter or right to
transact business in this State, except that the person is required to
pay the penalty set forth in subparagraph (1).
(b) Not an entity required to file an annual list with the Secretary
of State, the person shall pay a penalty in the amount of $100 in
addition to the annual state business license fee. The Secretary of
State shall provide to the person a written notice that:
(1) Must include a statement indicating the amount of the
fees and penalties required pursuant to this section and the costs
remaining unpaid.
(2) May be provided electronically, if the person has
requested to receive communications by electronic transmission, by
electronic mail or other electronic communication.
5. A person who continues to do business in this State without
renewing the person’s state business license before its renewal date
is subject to the fees and penalties provided for in this section unless
the person files a certificate of cancellation of the person’s state
business license with the Secretary of State.
6. The Secretary of State shall [waive] :
(a) Waive the annual state business license fee and any related
penalty imposed on a natural person or partnership if the natural
-
*AB274_R1*

– 6 –
person or partnership provides evidence satisfactory to the Secretary
of State that the natural person or partnership conducted no business
in this State during the period for which the fees and penalties
would be waived.
(b) For the 3 years following the issuance of a state business
license on or after July 1, 2025, waive the annual state business
license fee if the applicant for renewal of the state business license
is:
(1) A natural person who is an eligible veteran;
(2) A natural person who is a gold star family member; or
(3) An entity organized pursuant to this title in which at
least 51 percent of the ownership interest in the entity is held by
one or more eligible veterans or gold star family members.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB274_R1*